Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-502
Election; proposition; submission.

The manner of submitting such proposition shall be governed by section 23-126.

Laws 1895, c. 27, § 2, p. 129;

R.S.1913, § 437;

C.S.1922, § 354;

C.S.1929, § 11-702;

R.S.1943, § 23-502.